Washington statutes.
RCW 15.64.040

Use of funds for studies—Joint studies with other agencies.

Moneys appropriated to the department for agricultural marketing research shall be expended by the department to further studies by the department, the experiment station of Washington State University and the extension service of Washington State University. The studies shall be made jointly or in conjunction with those made by the United States Department of Agriculture as provided for in the Flannigan-Hope Act, Title II "The Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946" Public Law 733. All funds appropriated shall be expended jointly and as matching funds with any federal funds made available for such purposes.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.64.040. Prior: 1947 c 280 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-1.]